Louisiana, session 2026, HB721.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:499.4 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§499.4. Night shrimping; inside waters; Vermilion Bay; East and West Cote
Blanche Bays; Atchafalaya Bay; exceptions; prohibition
A. No person shall take shrimp at night, from one-half hour after official
sunset until one-half hour before official sunrise, from the inside waters of Vermilion
Bay, West Cote Blanche Bay, East Cote Blanche Bay, and Atchafalaya Bay, from
the western shore of Vermilion Bay to the western shore of the Atchafalaya River
and the Atchafalaya River Ship Channel out to Eugene Island, as described by the
inside-outside line in R.S. 56:495, except that night shrimping shall be allowed in the
waters of Southwest Pass at Marsh Island south of a line drawn from the following
points: the most southeastward point of Southwest Pass at 29 degrees 36 minutes 47
seconds north latitude, 92 degrees 00 minutes 32 seconds west longitude east
southeast to the Green Light Channel Marker Number 21 at 29 degrees 36 minutes
44 seconds north latitude, 92 degrees 00 minutes 21 seconds west longitude; thence
northeast to a point located at 29 degrees 37 minutes 34 seconds north latitude, 91
degrees 59 minutes 36 seconds west longitude; thence southeast to the western shore
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 721 ENROLLED
of Big Charles Bayou at 29 degrees 36 minutes 43 seconds north latitude, 91 degrees
59 minutes 17 seconds west longitude.
B. Notwithstanding Subsection A of this Section, during any open shrimp
season, licensed commercial shrimp harvesters may begin trawling in Vermilion
Bay, East Cote Blanche Bay, and West Cote Blanche Bay at 5:30 a.m.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.